tr: Klarnet zili akort etkisi: Kalın Mi/Si tonlamasını iyileştirir; Genel tonlamayı iyileştirir; Boğaz tonu tonlamasını iyileştirir; Diğer
ro-RO: Efect de acordare a pâlniei de clarinet: Îmbunătățește intonația Mi/Si grav; Îmbunătățește intonația generală; Îmbunătățește intonația notelor de gât; Altele
zh-CN: 单簧管喇叭口调音效果: 改善低音 E/B 音准; 改善整体音准; 改善喉音音准; 其他
sk-SK: Efekt ladenia ozvučníka klarinetu: Zlepšuje intonáciu nízkeho E/H; Zlepšuje celkovú intonáciu; Zlepšuje intonáciu hrdlových tónov; Iné
fr: Effet d’accord du pavillon de clarinette: Améliore l’intonation mi/si grave; Améliore l’intonation globale; Améliore l’intonation des notes de gorge; Autre
el: Εφέ συντονισμού/κουρδίσματος καμπάνας κλαρινέτου: Βελτιώνει τον τονισμό της χαμηλής Μι/Σι; Βελτιώνει τον συνολικό τονισμό; Βελτιώνει τον τονισμό των λαρυγγικών φθόγγων; Άλλο
hu: Klarinét haranghangoló effekt: Javítja a mély E/H intonációját; Javítja az általános intonációt; Javítja a torokhangok intonációját; Egyéb
cs: Efekt zvonu na ladění klarinetu: Zlepšuje intonaci nízkého E/B; Zlepšuje celkovou intonaci; Zlepšuje intonaci středních tónů; Jiné
da: Indvirkning på stemning fra klarinettens klokkedel: Forbedrer lav E/H-intonation; Forbedrer generel intonation; Forbedrer intonation af halstoner; Andet
lt-LT: Klarneto varpo derinimo efektas: Pagerina žemų E / B natų intonaciją; Pagerina bendrą intonaciją; Pagerina gerklinių natų intonaciją; Kita
pt-BR: Efeito de afinação da campana do clarinete: Melhora a afinação do Mi/Si grave; Melhora a afinação geral; Melhora a afinação dos sons de garganta; Outro
es: Efecto de afinación de la campana del clarinete: Mejora la entonación de Mi/Si grave; Mejora la entonación general; Mejora la entonación de las notas de garganta; Otro
nl: Klarinetbeker stemmingseffect: Verbetert intonatie van lage E/B; Verbetert algehele intonatie; Verbetert intonatie van keeltonen; Anders
ru: Влияние раструба кларнета на строй: Улучшает интонацию нижних ми/си; Улучшает общую интонацию; Улучшает интонацию горловых звуков; Другое
nb: Klarinettklokkestemmingseffekt: Forbedrer lav E/B-intonasjon; Forbedrer generell intonasjon; Forbedrer strupetone-intonasjon; Annen
zh-TW: 單簧管喇叭口調音效果: 改善低音 E/B 音準; 改善整體音準; 改善喉音音準; 其他
pt-PT: Efeito de afinação da campana do clarinete: Melhora a entoação do Mi/Si grave; Melhora a entoação geral; Melhora a entoação das notas de garganta; Outro
ja: クラリネットのベルのチューニング効果: 低音 E/B のイントネーションを改善; 全体的なイントネーションを改善; スロートトーンのイントネーションを改善; その他
pl: Wpływ czary głosowej klarnetu na strojenie: Poprawia intonację niskiego E/B; Poprawia ogólną intonację; Poprawia intonację dźwięków gardłowych; Inny
en: Clarinet bell tuning effect: Improves low E/B intonation; Improves overall intonation; Improves throat tone intonation; Other
hr-HR: Efekt ugađanja zvona klarineta: Poboljšava intonaciju niskog E/H; Poboljšava ukupnu intonaciju; Poboljšava intonaciju prijelaznog registra; Ostalo
fi: Klarinetin kellon viritysefekti: Parantaa matalan E:n / B:n intonaatiota; Parantaa yleistä intonaatiota; Parantaa kurkkuäänten intonaatiota; Muu
th: เอฟเฟกต์การปรับเสียงของปากลำโพงคลาริเน็ต: ปรับปรุงระดับเสียง E/B ต่ำ; ปรับปรุงระดับเสียงโดยรวม; ปรับปรุงระดับเสียงช่วงคอท่อ; อื่นๆ
vi: Hiệu ứng điều chỉnh âm của loa kèn clarinet: Cải thiện ngữ điệu nốt Mi/Si trầm; Cải thiện ngữ điệu tổng thể; Cải thiện ngữ điệu nốt yết hầu; Khác
ko: 클라리넷 벨 튜닝 효과: 저음 E/B 인토네이션 개선; 전반적인 인토네이션 개선; 스로트 톤 인토네이션 개선; 기타
it: effetto di accordatura della campana del clarinetto: Migliora l’intonazione del Mi/Si basso; Migliora l’intonazione generale; Migliora l’intonazione delle note di gola; Altro
de: Stimmungseffekt des Klarinettenschallbechers: Verbessert tiefe E/H-Intonation; Verbessert allgemeine Intonation; Verbessert Kehlton-Intonation; Sonstige
sl-SI: Učinek uglaševanja zvona klarineta: Izboljša intonacijo nizkega E/H; Izboljša splošno intonacijo; Izboljša intonacijo grlnih tonov; Drugo
bg-BG: Ефект на камбаната на кларинета върху настройката: Подобрява интонацията на ниско Ми/Си; Подобрява цялостната интонация; Подобрява интонацията на гърлените тонове; Друго
sv: Klarinettklockans stämningseffekt: Förbättrar låg E/B-intonation; Förbättrar övergripande intonation; Förbättrar intonation för halsregister; Annan